Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2201
Warrants; payment; order of presentation.

All warrants upon the State Treasurer or the treasurer of any county, city, school district, learning community, or other municipal corporation shall be paid in the order of their presentation therefor.

Laws 1871, § 1, p. 113;

Laws 1895, c. 67, § 1, p. 240;

R.S.1913, § 6642;

C.S.1922, § 6173;

C.S.1929, § 77-2401;

R.S.1943, § 77-2201;

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 12.

Bodies other than those within the strict and proper sense of the term municipal corporations are at times referred to as such for certain purposes; a sanitary and improvement district is a municipal corporation for purposes of this section. In re Application of S.I.D. No. 65, 219 Neb. 647, 365 N.W.2d 456 (1985).

Warrants issued in excess of authorized percentage of levy are not payable by county treasurer. State ex rel. Cody and West v. Colfax County, 10 Neb. 29, 4 N.W. 377 (1880).